da: Chassistype: Alt-i-en; Bladserver; Kompakt; Terning; Desktop; Fuldt tårn; JBOD; Micro ATX; Midtertårn; Minitårn; Modulær; NAS; Åben ramme; Pedestal; Rack-montering; SAN; SFF; Opbevaringskabinet; Tårn; Vægmonteret; Andet
fi: Asennuspohjatyyppi: Kaikki yhdessä; Blade-palvelin; Kompakti; Kuutio; Työpöytä; Täysi torni; JBOD; Micro ATX; Keskikokoinen torni; Minitorni; Modulaarinen; NAS; Avoin kehys; Jalusta; Telineeseen asennettu; SAN; SFF; Säilytyskotelo; Torni; Seinään kiinnitettävä; Muu
zh-CN: 机箱类型: 一体机; 刀片服务器; 压缩式; 立方体; 桌面式; 全塔; JBOD; Micro ATX; 中塔; 迷你塔; 模块化; NAS; 开放式框架; 基座; 机架安装; SAN; SFF; 存储盒; 塔式; 壁挂式; 其他
ko: 섀시 유형: 올인원; 블레이드 서버; 콤팩트; 큐브; 데스크탑; 풀 타워; JBOD; Micro ATX; 미드타워; 미니타워; 모듈식; NAS; 오픈 프레임; 페데스탈; 랙 마운트; SAN; SFF; 스토리지 인클로저; 타워; 벽걸이형; 기타
pl: Typ podwozia: Wszystko w jednym; Serwer kasetowy; Kompaktowy; Sześcian; Desktop; Pełna wieża; JBOD; Micro ATX; Średnia wieża; Miniwieża; Modułowy; NAS; Rama otwarta; Cokół; Montaż w stojaku; SAN; SFF; Obudowa do przechowywania; Wieża; Montowany na ścianie; Inne
ru: Форм-фактор корпуса: Все в одном; Блейд-сервер; Компактный; Куб; Настольный; Полноразмерный башенный; JBOD; Micro ATX; Среднеразмерная башня; Мини-башня; Модульный; NAS; Открытая рама; Пьедестал; Монтаж в стойку; SAN; SFF; Корпус для хранения; Башня; Настенный; Другое
nl: Chassistype: Alles-in-één; Bladeserver; Compact; Kubus; Op bureau; Volledige toren; JBOD; Micro-ATX; Middelgrote toren; Minitoren; Modulair; NAS; Open frame; Voetstuk; Rekmontage; SAN; SFF; Opbergbehuizing; Toren; Wandbevestiging; Andere
ja: シャーシのタイプ: オールインワン; ブレードサーバー; コンパクト; キューブ; デスクトップ; フルタワー; JBOD; Micro ATX; ミッドタワー; ミニタワー; モジュラー; NAS; オープンフレーム; 台座; ラックマウント; SAN; SFF; ストレージエンクロージャ; タワー; ウォールマウント; その他
nb: Chassistype: Alt i ett; Bladserver; Kompakt; Kube; Skrivebord; Fullt tårn; JBOD; Mikro-ATX; Midttårn; Minitårn; Modulær; NAS; Åpen ramme; Sokkel; Stativfeste; SAN; SFF; Oppbevaringsskap; Tårn; Veggfeste; Annet
ro-RO: Tip carcasă: All-in-one; Server lamă; Compact; Cub; Desktop; Full tower; JBOD; Micro ATX; Mid tower; Mini tower; Modular; NAS; Cadru deschis; Piedestal; Rack; SAN; SFF; Carcasă de depozitare; Tower; De perete; Altele
el: Τύπος πλαισίου: Όλα σε ένα; Εξυπηρετητής λεπίδων; Μικρών διαστάσεων; Κουτί; Επιτραπέζιο; Πλήρης πύργος; JBOD; Micro ATX; Πύργος μεσαίου ύψους; Μίνι πύργος; Αρθρωτό; NAS; Ανοιχτού πλαισίου; Βάθρο; Τοποθέτηση σε ράφι; SAN; SFF; Χώρος αποθήκευσης; Πύργος; Επιτοίχια; Άλλο
en: Chassis type: All-in-one; Blade server; Compact; Cube; Desktop; Full tower; JBOD; Micro ATX; Mid tower; Mini tower; Modular; NAS; Open frame; Pedestal; Rack mount; SAN; SFF; Storage enclosure; Tower; Wall-mounted; Other
cs: Typ počítačové skříně: All-in-One; Blade server; Kompaktní; Krychle; Stolní; Plná věž; JBOD; Micro ATX; Střední věž; Mini věž; Modulární; NAS; Otevřený rám; Podstavec; Montáž do regálu; SAN; SFF; Úložný kryt; Věž; Montáž na stěnu; Jiné
vi: Loại vỏ máy tính: Tất cả trong một; Máy chủ phiến; Nhỏ gọn; Khối lập phương; Để bàn; Toàn tháp; JBOD; Micro ATX; Tháp giữa; Tháp nhỏ; Mô-đun; Lưu trữ nối mạng; Khung mở; Bệ; Gắn trên giá; SAN; SFF; Bộ khung lưu trữ; Dạng tháp; Treo tường; Khác
bg-BG: Тип шаси: Всички в едно; Блейд сървър; Компактен; Куб; Работен плот; Пълна кула; JBOD; Micro ATX; Средна кула; Мини кула; Модулен; NAS; Отворена рамка; Пиедестал; Монтаж на стелаж; SAN; SFF; Корпус за съхранение; Кула; Стенен монтаж; Други
sv: Chassityp: Allt-i-ett; Bladserver; Kompakt; Kub; Desktop; Fullt torn; JBOD; Micro ATX; Mittorn; Minitorn; Modul; NAS; Öppen ram; Pedestal; Rackmonterad; SAN; SFF; Förvaringskåp; Torn; Väggmonterad; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta ohišja: Vse v enem; Strežniško; Kompaktno; Kocka; Namizno; Visoki stolp; JBOD; Micro ATX; Srednji stolp; Mini stolp; Modularno; NAS; Odprt okvir; S podstavkom; Montaža na stojalo; SAN; SFF; Zaprto ohišje; Stolp; Montaža na steno; Drugo
zh-TW: 機箱類型: 一體式電腦; 刀鋒伺服器; 小巧; 立方體; 桌上型; 全塔; JBOD; Micro-ATX; 中塔; 迷你塔; Modular; NAS; 開放式框架; 底座; 機架安裝; SAN; SFF; 儲存硬碟; 塔形; 壁掛式; 其他
es: Tipo de carcasa: Todo en uno; Servidor Blade; Compacto; Cubo; Escritorio; Torre completa; JBOD; Micro ATX; Torre mediana; Torre miniatura; Modular; NAS; Marco abierto; Pedestal; Montaje en bastidor; SAN; SFF; Caja de almacenamiento; Torre; Montaje en pared; Otros
sk-SK: Typ podvozku: Všetko v jednom; Blade (žiletkový) server; Kompaktný; Kocka; Osobný počítač; Plná veža; JBOD; Micro ATX; Stredná veža; Mini veža; Modulárny; NAS; Otvorený rám; Podstavec; Regálový držiak; SAN; SFF; Úložná konštrukcia; Veža; Nástenný; Iné
it: Tipo di telaio: All-in-one; Blade server; Compatta; Cubo; Desktop; Full tower; JBOD; Micro ATX; Mid tower; Mini tower; Modulare; NAS; Open frame; Piedistallo; Montaggio su rack; SAN; SFF; Sistema storage; Torre; Montato a parete; Altro
hu: Számítógépház típusa: All-in-one; Blade szerver; Kompakt; Cube; Asztali; Full Tower; JBOD; Micro ATX; Mid Tower; Mini Tower; Moduláris; NAS; Open Frame; Talp; Állványra szerelhető; SAN; SFF; Tároló; Torony; Falra szerelhető; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de chassi: Tudo em um; Servidor Blade; Compacto; Cubo; De secretária; Torre completa; JBOD; Micro ATX; Torre média; Minitorre; Modular; NAS; Estrutura aberta; Pedestal; Montagem em estante; SAN; SFF; Caixa de armazenamento; Torre; Com suporte de parede; Outro
th: ประเภทโครงรถ: ออลอินวัน; เบลดเซิร์ฟเวอร์; แบบกะทัดรัด; คิวบ์; สำหรับตั้งโต๊ะ; ฟูลทาวเวอร์; JBOD; Micro-ATX; มิดทาวเวอร์; มินิทาวเวอร์; แบบโมดูลาร์; NAS; แบบเปลือย; แท่น; ยึดกับราง; SAN; SFF; กล่องอุปกรณ์เก็บข้อมูล; ทาวเวอร์; ยึดกับผนัง; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de boîtier: PC tout-en-un; Serveur lame; Compact; Cube; Bureau; Tour complète; JBOD; Micro ATX; Tour moyenne; Mini tour; Modulaire; NAS; Cadre ouvert; Piédestal; Montage sur rail; SAN; SFF; Enceinte de stockage; Tour; Support mural; Autre
lt-LT: Korpuso tipas: Viskas viename; „Blade“ tipo serveris; Kompaktiškas; Dėžė; Stalinis; Aukštas bokštinis; JBOD; „Micro USB“; Vidutinis bokštinis; Mini bokštinis; Modulinis; NAS; Atviru rėmu; Pedestalinis; Stovas; SAN; SFF; Serverių spinta; Bokštinis; Sieninis; Kita
tr: Şasi Tipi: Hepsi bir arada; Yaprak sunucu; Kompakt; Küp; Masaüstü; Tam kule; JBOD; Mikro ATX; Orta kule; Mini kule; Modüler; NAS; Açık çerçeve; Taban; Raf montajı; SAN; SFF; Depolama muhafazası; Kule; Duvara monte; Diğer
de: Gehäusetyp: All-in-One; Bladeserver; Kompakt; Würfel; Desktop; Full tower; JBOD; Micro-ATX; Mid-Tower; Minitower; Modular; NAS; Offener Rahmen; Sockel; Rackmontage; SAN; SFF; Speichergehäuse; Turm; Wandmontage; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Vrsta kućišta: Sve u jednom; Blade poslužitelj; Kompaktno; Kocka; Stolno; Full tower; JBOD; Micro ATX; Mid tower; Mini tower; Modularno; NAS; Otvoreni okvir; Postolje; Montaža na stalak; SAN; SFF; Kućište za pohranu; Toranj; Zidni; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de chassi: All-in-one; Servidor Blade; Compacto; Cubo; Desktop; Full tower; JBOD; Micro ATX; Mid tower; Mini tower; Modular; NAS; Estrutura aberta; Pedestal; Montagem em rack; SAN; SFF; Gabinete de armazenamento; Torre; Montado na parede; Outro